New Jersey, session 221, A1532.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as Madalyns Law. 2.    Beginning with the 2020-2021 school year, each school district shall incorporate instruction on toxic shock syndrome in grades 4 through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards for Comprehensive Health and Physical Education.  The instruction shall include information on the causes and symptoms of toxic shock syndrome and the ways in which a student may reduce the risk for developing the syndrome.  The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with age-appropriate sample learning activities and resources designed to implement this requirement. 3.    a.  The owner of a group A or M occupancy that maintains a restroom that is open to the public and available for use by women, and that includes two or more toilets, shall ensure the installation and maintenance of a sign in the restroom alerting women to the warning signs, causes, and dangers of toxic shock syndrome.  The sign shall be installed on or near a tampon dispenser, if one exists in the restroom, or in a prominent location of the restroom.  The sign shall be installed on or before the first day of the sixth month next following the adoption of rules and regulations pursuant to subsection c. of this section. b.    The owner of a group A or M occupancy who violates the provisions of this section shall be liable for a penalty of not more than $100 for each violation to be collected in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The municipal court and the Superior Court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings for the enforcement of the penalties provided by this subsection. c.     The Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), in order to effectuate the purposes of this section.  The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, standards for the placement, appearance, and wording of the required signage, and the frequency and criteria of public access that shall cause a space to be designated as open to the public. d.    As used in this section, group A or M occupancy means an Assembly Group A occupancy or a Mercantile Group M occupancy, as defined in chapter 3 of the 2015 New Jersey International Building Code or its successor, with the exception of an occupancy located within an elementary school that does not include grades above grade 5. 4.    The Commissioner of Health shall prepare and make available on the Internet website of the Department of Health informational literature concerning the signs, causes, and dangers of toxic shock syndrome. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.